Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,139
Use of grievance procedure unrestricted.

Discipline shall not be imposed because of use of the grievance procedure.

Laws 1976, LB 275, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 83-4,119;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 64.